Nebraska, session 109, LB754.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB754 LB754
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 28-1229, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1229 (1) The Nebraska State Patrol shall have the authority to
issue permits for:
(a) The storage of explosive materials;
(b) The use of explosive materials; and
(c) The purchase of explosive materials by business enterprises.
(2) The Nebraska State Patrol shall not issue a permit to store or
use explosive materials to any person who:
(a) Is under twenty-one years of age;
(b) Has been convicted in any court of a felony;
(c) Is charged with a felony;
(d) Is a fugitive from justice;
(e) Is an unlawful user of any depressant, stimulant, or narcotic
drug;
(f) Has been admitted as a patient or inmate in a public or private
institution for the treatment of a mental or emotional disease or
disorder within five years preceding the date of application;
(g) Has no reasonable educational, industrial, commercial,
agricultural, recreational, or other legitimate need for a permit to
store or use explosive materials;
(h) Has been convicted in any court of a misdemeanor crime of
domestic violence. This includes any misdemeanor conviction involving the
use or attempted use of physical force committed by a current or former
spouse, parent, or guardian of the victim or by a person with a similar
relationship with the victim;
(i) Is subject to a court order restraining him or her from
harassing, stalking, or threatening an intimate partner or child of such
partner; or
(j) Is an alien illegally in the United States.
(3) Upon filing of a proper application and payment of the
-2-

LB754 LB754
2026 2026
prescribed fee, and subject to the provisions of sections 28-1213 to
28-1239 and other applicable laws, the Nebraska State Patrol shall issue
to such applicant a permit to store explosive materials if:
(a) The applicant, including, in the case of a corporation,
partnership, limited liability company, or association, any individual
possessing, directly or indirectly, the power to direct or cause the
direction of the management and policies of the corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, or association, is not a person to whom the
Nebraska State Patrol is prohibited to issue a permit under subsection
(2) of this section;
(b) The applicant has not willfully violated any of the provisions
of sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 or of 18 U.S.C. chapter 40; and
(c) The applicant has a place of storage for explosive materials
which meets such standards of public safety, based on the class, type,
and quantity of explosive materials to be stored, and security against
theft as prescribed in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by
the Nebraska State Patrol pursuant to sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 and by
the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States pursuant to 18 U.S.C.
chapter 40.
(4) A permit for the storage of explosive materials shall specify
the class, type, and quantity of explosive materials which are authorized
to be stored. It shall also specify the type of security required. A
permit for the storage of explosive materials shall be valid for a period
of three two years unless a shorter period is specified in the permit.
(5) Upon filing of a proper application and payment of the
prescribed fee, and subject to the provisions of sections 28-1213 to
28-1239 and other applicable laws, the Nebraska State Patrol shall issue
to such applicant a permit to use explosive materials if:
(a) The applicant is an individual to whom the Nebraska State Patrol
is not prohibited to issue a permit under subsection (2) of this section;
(b) The applicant has not willfully violated any of the provisions
-3-

LB754 LB754
2026 2026
of sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 or of 18 U.S.C. chapter 40;
(c) The applicant has demonstrated and certified in writing that he
or she is familiar with all published laws of this state and published
local ordinances relating to the use of explosive materials applicable at
the place or places he or she intends to use such explosive materials;
(d) The applicant has demonstrated that he or she has adequate
knowledge, training, and experience in the use of explosive materials of
the class and type for which he or she seeks a users permit and has
passed a qualifying examination, as prescribed by the Nebraska State
Patrol, concerning the use of such explosive materials; and
(e) The applicant has been fingerprinted and the fingerprints
submitted to the Nebraska State Patrol for a criminal history record
check. If no disqualifying record is located at the state level, the
fingerprints shall be forwarded by the patrol to the Identification
Division of the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal
history record check.
(6) A permit for the use of explosive materials shall specify the
class and type of explosive materials the permitholder is qualified to
use. It shall be applicable to the permitholder and to any individual
acting under his or her direct personal supervision. A permit may be
issued for a single use of explosive materials or, when the applicant is
engaged or employed in a business requiring the frequent use of explosive
materials, for a period of not more than three two years.
(7) Upon filing of a proper application and payment of the
prescribed fees and subject to sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 and other
applicable laws, the Nebraska State Patrol shall issue to a business
enterprise a permit to purchase explosive materials if:
(a) The business enterprise has a place of business in this state;
(b) No individual possessing, directly or indirectly, the power to
direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of the
business enterprise is a person to whom the Nebraska State Patrol is
-4-

LB754 LB754
2026 2026
prohibited to issue a permit under subsection (2) of this section;
(c) An authorized officer of the business enterprise certifies that
all explosive materials will be used on the date of purchase of such
materials unless such business enterprise is in possession of a valid
storage permit; and
(d) The business enterprise employs at least one employee having a
valid use permit issued under this section.
(8) A permit for a business enterprise to purchase explosive
materials shall specify the class and type of explosive materials which
are authorized to be purchased. The class and type of explosive materials
covered by such permit shall be the same as those specified in the use
permit or permits issued to an employee or employees of the business
enterprise. The permit may be issued for a period of up to three two
years but shall become void if the business enterprise ceases to employ
an individual having a valid use permit issued under this section for the
class and type of explosive materials covered by the purchase permit of
the business enterprise.
(9) If the applicant is an individual, an application for a permit
issued under this section shall include the applicant's social security
number.
Sec. 2. Section 28-1239.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-1239.01 (1) No person shall conduct a public exhibition or
display of display fireworks without first procuring a display permit
from the State Fire Marshal. Such application for a display permit shall
be accompanied by (a) proof of a permit for the use of explosive
materials issued by the Nebraska State Patrol and (b) a fee of one
hundred dollars to be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
State Fire Marshal Cash Fund.
(2) No display fireworks shall be sold or delivered by a licensed
distributor to any person who is not in possession of an approved display
-5-

LB754 LB754
2026 2026
permit. Sales of display fireworks to persons without an approved display
permit shall be subject to sections 28-1213 to 28-1239.
Sec. 3. Original section 28-1229, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 28-1239.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
-6-